Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.19054

Exemptions from statewide policy for purchasing and material control.

The provisions of *RCW 43.19.1905 do not apply to materials, supplies, and equipment purchased for resale to other than public agencies by state agencies, including educational institutions.

[ 2012 c 2 s 201 (Initiative Measure No. 1183, approved November 8, 2011); 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.19.1905 was repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29, effective January 1, 2013.

Finding—Application—Rules—Effective date—Contingent effective date—2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183): See notes following RCW 66.24.620.